Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB38.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 243.042 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A qualified historic site license may be issued to any establishment meeting the
criteria established in KRS 241.010 as long as the establishment is within:
(a) Any wet territory; or
(b) Any precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under KRS
242.1242.
(2) A qualified historic site license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Sell alcoholic beverages by the drink at one (1) or more permanent or
nonpermanent locations on the premises over which the licensee, by lease or
ownership, has exclusive control without obtaining additional supplemental
bar licenses prescribed by KRS 243.037;
(b) Sell alcoholic beverages by the drink to patrons at public or private functions
held on the premises;
(c) Sell alcoholic beverages by the package under a limited nonquota package
license to patrons at public or private functions held on the premises in a
jurisdiction that has authorized the sale of distilled spirits and wine by the
package; and
(d)[(c)] Purchase and store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS
243.088, 243.250, and 244.260.
Section 2. KRS 243.238 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A limited nonquota package license may be issued as a supplementary license to a
licensee that holds an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an NQ3
retail drink license, a quota retail drink license, a qualified historic site license, or a
limited restaurant license in a jurisdiction that has authorized the sale of distilled
spirits and wine by the package.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1028
(2) The limited nonquota package license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Purchase private selection packages in the original manufacturer's unopened
containers; and
(b) Sell private selection packages at retail in the original manufacturer's
unopened containers, and only for consumption off the licensed premises.
(3) The licensee shall purchase private selection packages in accordance with KRS
243.0305(4).
Section 3. KRS 243.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each kind of license listed in
KRS 243.030 shall be incompatible with every other kind listed in that section and
no person or entity holding a license of any of those kinds shall apply for or hold a
license of another kind listed in KRS 243.030.
(2) (a) Each kind of license listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4) shall be
incompatible with every other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4), and
no person holding a license of any of those kinds shall apply for or hold a
license of any other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4).
(b) A brewery holding a license listed in KRS 243.040(5) or (8) shall not apply
for or hold a license listed in KRS 243.040(3) or (4).
(3) (a) The holder of a quota retail package license may also hold a quota retail drink
license, an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an NQ3 retail
drink license, a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license, or a special
nonbeverage alcohol license.
(b) The holder of a transporter's license may also hold a distilled spirits and wine
storage license.
(c) The holder of a distiller's license may also hold a rectifier's license, a special
nonbeverage alcohol license, a winery license, or a small farm winery license.
(d) A commercial airline system or charter flight system retail license, a
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1028
commercial airline system or charter flight system transporter's license, and a
retail drink license if held by a commercial airline or charter flight system
may be held by the same licensee.
(e) A Sunday retail drink license, vintage distilled spirits license, and
supplemental license may be held by the holder of a primary license.
(f) The holder of a distiller's, winery, small farm winery, brewer, microbrewery,
distilled spirits and wine supplier's, or malt beverage supplier's license may
also hold a direct shipper license.
(g) The holder of an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an
NQ3 retail drink license, a quota retail drink license, a qualified historic site
license, or a limited restaurant license may also hold a limited nonquota
package license.
(4) (a) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license shall not
apply for or hold the license listed in KRS 243.030(5) or 243.040(3).
(b) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license shall also
hold a quota retail package license.
(c) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license may hold it as
a primary license or as a supplemental license to a distributor's license or a
wholesaler's license.
(5) Any person may hold two (2) or more licenses of the same kind.
(6) A person or entity shall not evade the prohibition against applying for or holding
licenses of two (2) kinds by applying for a second license through or under the
name of a different person or entity. The state administrator shall examine the
ownership, membership, and management of applicants, and shall deny the
application for a license if the applicant is substantially interested in a person or
entity that holds an incompatible license.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:33 PM Jacketed